District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2502.18

Investment of funds by domestic companies.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1072, ch. 792, ch. II, § 18
July 19, 1954, 68 Stat. 494, ch. 546, § 1
Oct. 3, 1962, 76 Stat. 715, Pub. L. 87-739, § 2
Oct. 30, 1981, D.C. Law 4-50, § 3, 28 DCR 4258
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-174, § 3, 29 DCR 5753
June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-141, § 3, 37 DCR 2654
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(a), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1521.
1973 Ed., § 35-1321.

Editor's Notes

Home Owners’ Loan Corporation abolished: The Home Owners’ Loan Corporation, referred to in paragraph (9) of subsection (a), was dissolved by order of the Secretary of the Home Loan Bank Board, effective February 3, 1954, pursuant to the Act of June 30, 1953, 67 Stat. 121.